Washington statutes.
RCW 11.56.210

Assignment of decedent's contract.

Upon the confirmation of such sale, the personal representative shall execute to the purchaser an assignment of the contract and deed, which shall vest in the purchaser, his or her heirs and assigns, all the right, title, and interest of the persons entitled to the interest of the deceased in the land sold at the time of the sale, and such purchaser shall have the same rights and remedies against the vendor of such lands as the deceased would have had if living.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2050; 1965 c 145 s 11.56.210. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 142; RRS s 1512; prior: Code 1881 s 1522; 1854 p 289 s 132.]